Illinois, session 104th, SB902.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Uniform Interstate Depositions and 5Discovery Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 35/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-79, eff. 1-1-16.)